District of Columbia statutes.
42-203

Persons who may bring actions.

(a)

An action affecting a conservation easement may be brought by 1 of the following:

(1)

An owner of an interest in the real property burdened by the easement;

(2)

A holder of the easement;

(3)

A person having a third-party right of enforcement; or

(4)

A person authorized by other law.

(b)

This chapter does not affect the power of a court to modify or terminate a conservation easement in accordance with the principles of law and equity.

History

May 16, 1986, D.C. Law 6-113, § 4, 33 DCR 1996

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-202.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2603.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 3 of the Uniform Conservation Easement Act.